Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 41 Department of the Treasury

41.010.
Definitions for KRS 41.070, 41.110, 41.120, 41.130, 41.280, 41.290, or 41.300 — Definitions for chapter.

As used in KRS

41.070

,

41.110

,

41.120

,

41.130

,

41.280

,

41.290

, or

41.300

, unless the context requires otherwise, the terms “appropriation,” “budget unit,” “disbursements,” “expenditures,” “expenses,” and “receipts” have the meaning given them by KRS

43.010

and

48.010

.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrative body” includes an authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, or any other form of organization in the executive branch of state government, but does not include office, department, program cabinet, or division;

“Agency” means any state administrative body, program cabinet, office, department, or division;

“Assistant” means assistant treasurer;

“Bank” includes any bank or savings and loan association chartered by the State of Kentucky or the United States government designated to take custody of state funds on deposit, for periods greater than overnight, with the intent to honor presentments against those deposits;

“Check,” unless the context requires otherwise, means either a paper check or a paperless entry on an electronic data processing medium that substitutes for a paper check and of which a permanent record is made for purposes of debiting or crediting an account;

“Collateral” means the listed securities and other obligations in KRS 41.240(4);

“Form” or “report” means any written method of transporting data;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“State depository” means any bank designated to take custody of state funds on deposit pursuant to KRS

41.220

;

“Warrant” means a printed or electronic authorization from the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the Treasurer to issue a check; and

“Writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

History.

1992b-2: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; ch. 450, § 55, effective July 1, 1983; 1998, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 26, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 155, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation does not have to deposit the moneys it receives in the State Treasury since it is not a budget unit of the Commonwealth, a budget unit being a department or other unit of organization for which separate appropriations are made from those for any other organization unit (this section, KRS

43.010

and

45.010

(now repealed), see KRS

48.010

).

OAG 81-129

.

Since the General Assembly in subsection (2) of this section defined “bank” and “depository” to include savings and loan associations, such institutions can be considered as state depositories so long as they satisfy the remaining criteria found in Chapter 41 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

OAG 92-83

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Acts of General Assembly, treasurer entitled to copies of, KRS

57.300

.

Books received from librarian, care and custody of, KRS

57.360

,

57.370

.

Constitutional provisions as to treasurer, Ky. Const., §§ 91, 93, 95, 96, 152, 228.

Deposits of insurers, KRS

304.8-010

et seq.

Election, term, qualifications, when to enter office, duties, fees, Ky. Const., §§ 91, 93, 95.

Library service work, treasurer trustee of federal grants for, KRS

171.160

.

Motor vehicle reparations act, KRS

304.39-010

et seq.

Oath of treasurer, Ky. Const., § 228.

Teachers’ retirement system, treasurer member, ex officio treasurer and custodian of funds of, KRS

161.250

,

161.370

,

161.380

.

Unemployment insurance fund, treasurer ex officio treasurer of, KRS

341.500

.

Vocational education and rehabilitation, treasurer custodian of federal grants for, KRS

151B.155

.

Workers’ compensation subsequent injury fund, KRS

342.122

.

41.020.
Treasurer head of department — Where to keep office.

The Department of the Treasury shall be headed by the State Treasurer. He shall reside and keep his office at the seat of government.

History.

Recodified 1942 Ky. Acts ch. 208, sec. 1, effective October 1, 1942, from Ky. Stat. secs. 4618-77, 4684.

41.025.
Tuition Account Program Office. [Repealed.]

41.030.
Bond of Treasurer. [Repealed.]

41.040.
Salary of Treasurer. [Repealed.]

41.050.
Suspension of Treasurer. [Repealed]

History.

4685; repealed by 2021 ch. 155, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

41.060.
Assistant treasurer.

The Treasurer shall appoint an assistant and may remove him or her at pleasure. The assistant shall take the constitutional oath. The assistant may perform any of the duties of the Treasurer, excepting the signing of checks, and shall perform the duties of clerk.

If the Treasurer is incapacitated, or is absent from the seat of government, the assistant shall discharge the duties of the office during the incapacity or absence of the Treasurer.

The Treasurer and his or her sureties shall be responsible on his or her bond for all the acts and omissions of the assistant.

The salary of the assistant shall be fixed by the Treasurer, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.

History.

4682, 4683: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 27, § 45; 1962, ch. 210, § 4; 1982, ch. 448, § 59, effective July 15, 1982; 2021 ch. 155, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

41.070.
Moneys to be deposited in state depositories — Exceptions — Designated depositories — Records of agencies.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by law, no receipts from any source of state money or money for which the state is responsible shall be held, used, or deposited in any personal or special bank account, temporarily or otherwise, by any agent or employee of any budget unit, to meet expenditures or for any other purpose.

All receipts of any character of any budget unit, all revenue collected for the state, and all public money and dues to the state shall be deposited in state depositories in the most prompt and cost-efficient manner available. However in the case of state departments or agencies located outside Frankfort, and all state institutions, the Finance and Administration Cabinet may permit temporary deposits to be made to the accounts maintained by the agency, department, or institution in a state depository for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days, and may require that the money be forwarded to the State Treasury at the time and in the manner and form prescribed by the cabinet. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any representative of any agency, department, or institution to enforce or cash, even for the purpose of a deposit, any check or other instrument of value payable to the Commonwealth or any agency thereof.

Each agency depositing its receipts directly with the State Treasurer shall do so in the manner approved by the State Treasurer as agent in charge of public fund deposits.

The Department of Revenue may deposit receipts to the credit of the State Treasury directly with a state depository utilized by the Commonwealth for its primary banking services. The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may authorize other agencies to deposit receipts directly with a state depository to the credit of the State Treasury if the Treasurer prescribes the manner in which the deposit is to be made, and the forms and reports to be filed with the Treasury Department. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prescribe the forms and reports to be filed with it when this type of deposit is made.

Each department, agency, or other budget unit which receives funds to be deposited into the State Treasury shall maintain records to report adequately each amount received, from whom received, and date received. Agency records shall be easily reconcilable with the information forwarded to the State Treasurer.

History.

1922b-45, 4618-85, 4686: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 244, § 1; 1968, ch. 119, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1982, ch. 382, § 31, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 58, § 1, effective March 10, 1994; 1998, ch. 118, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 46, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 155, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

41.080.
Permits to Treasurer to receive money. [Repealed.]

41.090.
Pay-in vouchers. [Repealed.]

41.100.
Treasurer to receive and acknowledge notification of moneys from state agencies.

The Treasurer shall receive notification from state agencies of all money due or payable to the state. The Treasurer shall provide acknowledgment of the notification to the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

4695: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In the limited circumstance where federal law preempts state law that would otherwise govern, the State Treasurer may authorize, without a completed “warrant” at the time the authorization is given, the financial agent of the U.S. Treasury to debit the bank account of the Commonwealth for the amount the Commonwealth owes in federal tax deposits.

OAG 94-65

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Finance and Administration Cabinet to keep receipt book, KRS

45.310

.

41.110.
Restrictions on withdrawals of money from Treasury.

No public money shall be withdrawn from the Treasury for any purpose other than that for which its withdrawal is proposed in accordance with the Constitution and statutes of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, nor unless it has been appropriated by the General Assembly or is a part of a revolving fund, and has been allotted as provided in KRS

48.010

to

48.800

, and then only on the warrant of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The provisions of this section do not apply to withdrawals of funds from one (1) or more state depositories for immediate redeposit in other state depositories or to funds held in trust for the security of bond holders.

History.

1992b-36; 4688: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1982, ch. 450, § 56, effective July 1, 1983; 2021 ch. 155, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

41.120.
Claims to be paid by warrants — Warrant authorizes Treasurer to pay — Manner of authorization.

All claims against the state shall be paid by the Treasurer on the warrants of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

All warrants issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall, when signed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or an assistant designated by him or her, constitute full and sufficient authority to the Treasurer for the disbursement of public money in the amount set forth.

Signatures may be placed on the warrants by means of an approved mechanical device. A signed transmittal which lists warrants may be accepted in lieu of each warrant being signed. Electronic authorization, approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may be accepted in lieu of any signatures.

History.

1992b-34, 1992b-37: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 101, § 1; 1968, ch. 119, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although the responsibility for receiving and processing the documentation supportive of claims against the state and issuing the proper and legal warrants rests with the Executive Department for Finance and Administration (now Finance and Administration Cabinet), the State Treasurer may question any particular warrant if it is done in good faith and on good constitutional grounds.

OAG 76-221

.

In the limited circumstance where federal law preempts state law that would otherwise govern, the State Treasurer may authorize, without a completed “warrant” at the time the authorization is given, the financial agent of the U.S. Treasury to debit the bank account of the Commonwealth for the amount the Commonwealth owes in federal tax deposits.

OAG 94-65

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Finance and Administration Cabinet to keep record of money paid out of Treasury and of warrants issued, KRS

45.310

.

41.130.
Warrants — Contents — Conditions of issuance
Unified and integrated system of accounts.

Each warrant of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the Treasury shall specify the date, amount, and person to whom payable, and no money shall be disbursed by the Treasurer unless the warrant contains these specifications.

No warrant shall be issued unless the money to pay it has been appropriated by law. The Finance and Administration Cabinet may require any claimant to state on the face of his claim the law under which it is payable.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall record all warrants in the unified and integrated system of accounts.

The Treasurer shall maintain electronic records in the unified and integrated system of accounts that show all checks issued, the name of the payee, date, and amount and shall be in a format that is readily reconcilable with the warrants issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

143, 146, 1992b-37, 4689: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

41.140.
Warrants to be submitted to Treasurer. [Repealed]

History.

1992b-51: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2021 ch. 155, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

41.150.
Treasurer to accept warrants — Payment — Register of checks. [Repealed]

History.

1992b-37, 4688a-1: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); repealed by 2021 ch. 155, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

41.160.
Payments to be made by Treasurer.

No money shall be paid out of the Treasury except by the check of the Treasurer upon a state depository, or through the provisions of KRS

45A.655

.

Payments may be made direct by the Treasurer to the persons entitled to receive them, by mail or otherwise, or through the heads of the budget units which incurred the expenditures.

History.

1992b-34, 4688, 4689: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 7; 1998, ch. 118, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

41.165.
Wage payment by electronic transfer of funds — Request forms.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

337.010

through

337.070

and

41.160

, the Treasurer shall pay, by electronic fund transfer, the wages of any state employee who makes a prior written request to the employing state agency to be paid by electronic fund transfer. The Treasurer may refuse to comply with the request of an employee if the financial institution designated by the employee does not have the capability of receiving electronic transfers of funds.

The Personnel Cabinet shall provide forms on which to request wage payments by electronic transfer of funds. The Personnel Cabinet may, by regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, require information on the request forms for wage payment by electronic transfer of funds that sufficiently identifies the employee and the designated financial institution of the employee.

Any state agencies which employ persons who have exercised the option authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall retain the forms described in subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 252, § 1, effective July 1, 1983; 1998, ch. 118, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 60, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 118 and 154 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(10/5/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), KRS Chapter 13A has been substituted for the prior reference to KRS Chapter 13 in this statute. The sections in KRS Chapter 13 were repealed by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 417, § 36 and KRS Chapter 13A was created in that same chapter of the 1984 Ky. Acts.

41.167.
Electronic funds transfers.

The State Treasurer may withdraw funds from or deposit funds in the State Treasury by means of electronic funds transfers. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall obtain a payee’s prior, written consent for the payment of funds due him or her from the State Treasury by means of direct deposit rather than by means of a paper check issued to him or her. A single authorization may be granted for multiple payments to a payee by means of direct deposit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 118, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

41.170.
Record of warrants in system of accounts — Notice of issuance of checks. [Repealed]

History.

146, 1992b-53: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2021 ch. 155, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

41.180.
Interest-bearing warrants; how and when issued. [Repealed.]

41.185.
Maximum limit on interest-bearing warrants. [Repealed.]

41.190.
Calling warrants for payment. [Repealed.]

41.200.
Warrants negotiable and tax-free.

All warrants heretofore or hereafter issued by the state, whether the date of maturity is fixed or not, are negotiable instruments. No warrant shall be subject to taxation by the state or any subdivision thereof.

History.

4688a-8.

41.210.
Public money to be deposited in state depositories.

All public money of the state received into the Treasury shall be deposited, on the day it is received, in one (1) or more of the state depositories.

History.

1992b-44, 4686, 4692; 2021 ch. 155, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

41.220.
Designation of banks as state depositories — Minimum capital stock requirement — Use of banks if state depositories not designated.

Not less than three (3) solvent banks shall be designated as state depositories for state funds. Each bank designated shall have not less than the minimum capital stock as required by the primary state or federal regulator of the bank. Banks shall be designated as state depositories for state funds upon agreement of the State Treasurer and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Those banks designated shall be entered in the executive journal. If at any time it appears that the capital of any state depository has become impaired, the state’s deposits shall be withdrawn and deposited with another state depository.

The State Treasurer and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall determine the needs for moving state funds from one (1) designated depository to another.

If no banks are designated as state depositories in accordance with this section, all banks as defined in KRS

41.010

shall be considered eligible state depositories.

History.

1992b-44, 4692: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 115; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 18, effective July 1, 1956; 1998, ch. 196, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 10, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 247 instructs the Reviser of Statutes to adjust KRS references throughout the statutes to conform with the 2006 renumbering of the Financial Services Code, KRS Chapter 286. Such an adjustment has been made in this statute.

41.230.
Charges for services by state depositories — Interest on deposits.

For services rendered by state depositories, compensation shall be made in the form of a predetermined fee or a predetermined compensating balance. State depositories shall each pay to the state, in proportion to the deposits received, interest at such rate per annum upon the average daily deposit on hand at the close of business hours as is agreed upon between the Treasurer and the state depositories, consistent with the regulations promulgated by the State Investment Commission pursuant to KRS

42.525

. The interest shall be paid to the Treasurer no later than at the end of each six (6) months or upon maturity commencing with the date of the deposit.

History.

4692: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2021 ch. 155, § 11, effective June 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Unemployment insurance fund, no public deposit insurance charge or premium to be paid out of, KRS

341.500

.

41.240.
Pledge of collateral required of state depositories — Qualifications for a reduced pledge — Eligible securities and other obligations.

Before any bank shall be named as a state depository to receive public funds, it shall either pledge or provide to the State Treasurer collateral having an aggregate current face value or current quoted market value at least equal to the deposits as of the last business day of each quarter in which funds are so deposited or provide to the State Treasurer a surety bond or surety bonds in favor of the State Treasurer in an amount at least equal to the deposits, as of the last business day of each quarter in which funds are deposited; provided, however, that amounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation need not be so collateralized. The president or an executive officer of each state depository shall submit to the Treasurer and the State Investment Commission a statement subscribed and sworn to by the president or executive officer showing:

The face value or current quoted market value of the securities or other obligations pledged as collateral; and

The value of surety bonds provided as of the time such surety bonds are provided as collateral.

The aggregate valuation of all pledged or provided collateral shall be reported to the State Treasurer and State Investment Commission by the state depository within ten (10) days of the close of each quarter after the date of deposit. Such value with respect to pledged collateral other than surety bonds shall be as of the end of the quarter or the preceding business day and, as to surety bonds, the market values shall be obtained from a reputable bond-pricing service. The State Treasurer and Governor may from time to time call for additional collateral to adequately secure the deposits as aggregate face or current market values may require, if the value of collateral is not compliant with state law as of the report date.

No deposit of state funds shall collectively exceed at any time the state depository’s sum of capital, reserves, undivided profits and surplus or ten percent (10%) of the total deposits of the state depository, whichever is less. For purposes of this subsection only, the value of the state deposit will be determined as of the end of the last business day of each quarter that funds are deposited.

As an alternative to subsection (1)(a) of this section, a state depository insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation may either pledge to the State Treasurer, as collateral, securities or other obligations having an aggregate face value or a current quoted market value or provide to the State Treasurer a surety bond or surety bonds in an amount equal to eighty percent (80%) of the value of the state deposit including demand and time accounts, if the state depository is determined by the State Investment Commission to have very strong credit with little or no credit risk at any maturity level and the likelihood of short-term unexpected problems of significance is minimal or not of a serious or long-term nature. The value of the state deposit will be determined at the end of the business day of deposit and as of the end of business on the last day of each quarter that funds are so deposited.

Valuation of all pledged or provided collateral shall be reported to the State Treasurer and the State Investment Commission within ten (10) days of the close of each quarter after the date of deposit.

State depositories designated as qualified for reduced pledging shall be so recorded in the executive journal.

The State Investment Commission shall determine eligibility for the reduced pledging option based on totally objective and quantifiable measures of financial intermediary performance. The information for such eligibility shall be obtained from publicly available documents. The State Investment Commission shall promulgate the particular criteria of eligibility by regulations issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

State depositories which do not qualify or do not choose to qualify under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not receive state deposits in excess of amounts that are insured by an instrumentality of the United States.

Only the following securities and other obligations may be accepted by the State Treasurer as collateral under this section:

Bonds, notes, letters of credit, or other obligations of or issued or guaranteed by the United States, or those for which the credit of the United States is pledged for the payment of the principal and interest thereof, and any bonds, notes, debentures, letters of credit, or any other obligations issued or guaranteed by any federal governmental agency or instrumentality, presently or in the future established by an Act of Congress, as amended or supplemented from time to time, including, without limitation, the United States government corporations listed in KRS 66.480(1)(c);

Obligations of the Commonwealth of Kentucky including revenue bonds issued by its statutory authorities, commissions, or agencies;

Revenue bonds issued by educational institutions of the Commonwealth of Kentucky as authorized by KRS

162.340

to

162.380

;

Obligations of any city of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any county, for the payment of principal and interest on which the full faith and credit of the issuing body is pledged;

School improvement bonds issued in accordance with the authority granted under KRS

162.080

to

162.100

;

School building revenue bonds issued in accordance with the authority granted under KRS

162.120

to

162.300

, provided that the issuance of such bonds is approved by the Kentucky Board of Education;

Surety bonds issued by sureties rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest categories by a nationally recognized rating agency;

Letters of credit issued by federal home loan banks; and

Real property owned by the bank.

HISTORY:

4693: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 221; 1972, ch. 118, § 1; 1978, ch. 155, § 82, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 382, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 554, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 112, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2014, ch. 92, § 24, effective January 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 155, § 12, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/5/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), KRS Chapter 13A has been substituted for the prior reference to KRS Chapter 13 in this statute. The sections in KRS Chapter 13 were repealed by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 417, § 36 and KRS Chapter 13A was created in that same chapter of the 1984 Ky. Acts.

41.245.
Pledge of county bonds to secure deposits. [Repealed.]

41.250.
Liability of Treasurer and state depository not affected by bond or pledge.

The execution of the bond or the pledge of the warrants or bonds required by KRS

41.240

shall not diminish the liability of the Treasurer and his or her sureties upon his or her bond, nor impair or delay the right of the state to recover on the Treasurer’s bond for any loss or misapplication of the public funds or other delinquency in office, nor impair or delay the right of the state to recover from any delinquent or defaulting bank, or the officers or stockholders thereof, in the same manner as other depositors.

History.

4693; 2021 ch. 155, § 13, effective June 29, 2021.

41.260.
Transfer of deposits among state depositories.

Whenever the Treasurer decides to transfer any deposit of public money from one (1) state depository to another, the Treasurer shall notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet, describing the proposed transfer and the deposit of money to be transferred. On receipt of the notification the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall register the proposed transfer and issue its warrant for the amounts specified by the Treasurer. When the transfers have been completed the Treasurer shall immediately notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

1992b-48: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 14, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If the secretary of finance and the State Treasurer agree in writing to the moving of the deposit account of the Kentucky retirement systems from the state’s general fund account from one bank to another, such moving of the deposit account would be legal, although it would entail some new accounting procedure on the part of the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) and the State Treasury. The court assumes, of course, that the Citizens Fidelity Bank is already a designated state depository. Thus the transfer of the Kentucky retirement systems account would be permissible under the joint determination and agreement of the State Treasurer and secretary of finance.

OAG 79-396

.

KRS 41.220(2) and this section are to be read together as a whole, under the doctrine of pari materia.

OAG 79-396

.

41.270.
Monthly statements from depositories. [Repealed.]

41.280.
Unified and integrated system of accounts — Annual report by Treasurer.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall maintain a unified and integrated system of accounts. As a part of any unified and integrated system of accounts:

The Treasurer shall maintain the necessary records to exhibit accurately the Treasury’s cash balance;

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide the Treasurer with accounting data that will accurately describe the Commonwealth’s financial condition, including access to information necessary to determine the status of each receipt and expenditure account;

The Treasurer shall keep a record of each depository, showing the amount deposited and the date, and the amount checked out and the date; and

The Treasurer shall provide the Finance and Administration Cabinet with information regarding accumulated receipts and the status of warrants.

The Treasurer shall make a clear, distinct, and intelligible report of all money received and disbursed during each fiscal year showing the receipts and expenditures of each year on account of every department of the public service, the name of each state depository, and the rate of interest paid by it. The report shall be published annually, and the Treasurer shall submit the report to the Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission ninety (90) days after the close of the fiscal year.

History.

4697: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, 9(1); 2021 ch. 155, § 15, effective June 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Airport development fund, KRS

183.772

.

Common school fund provided for, Ky. Const., §§ 184, 185, 186; KRS

157.010

.

County sinking fund, treasurer to keep separate, for deposits under county debt act, KRS

66.370

.

Delinquent tax fund, KRS

134.400

.

Finance and Administration Cabinet to keep accounts with receipts, payments and depositories independent of those kept by treasurer, KRS

45.305

.

Federal grants for library service work, special fund for, KRS

171.160

.

Fiscal year, Ky. Const., § 169.

Forest reserves, federal grants for to be kept in separate fund, KRS

149.130

.

Highway bridge fund, KRS

180.240

.

Revolving fund accounts, KRS

45.253

.

Road fund, KRS ch. 176.

State Fair Board, improvement fund, to be kept by treasurer, KRS

247.190

.

State fire and tornado insurance fund, duties of treasurer as to, KRS

56.090

to

56.160

.

Unemployment compensation administration fund, KRS

341.240

.

Unemployment compensation contingent fund, KRS

341.295

.

Unemployment insurance fund, KRS

341.500

,

341.510

.

Public Service Commission, assessments for expenses of to be kept in separate fund, KRS

278.150

.

Workers’ compensation subsequent injury fund, KRS

342.122

.

41.290.
Private funds and contributions.

Every department, institution or other agency of the state government having private funds or contributions available for its support or for the purpose of defraying the expenses of any work done under its direction shall deposit such funds or contributions with the Treasurer, and shall certify to the Finance and Administration Cabinet the sources from which the funds or contributions were received, the terms and conditions under which, and the purpose for which, they were received, the names of the trustees or administrators of the funds or contributions, and the name of the person authorized to approve expenditures from each fund or contribution. All disbursements from such funds and contributions shall be made by the Treasurer on the warrants of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall issue such warrants only upon adequate vouchers approved by the person authorized to approve the expenditures. Separate accounting shall be made for each such contribution, and the receipts and disbursements thereof shall be maintained by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. This section does not apply to private funds of students in state educational institutions nor to the private funds of patients or prisoners in state charitable or correctional institutions, when such funds are deposited with an officer of such institutions for safekeeping, nor to the private funds or contributions made and available to the governing boards of the state supported institutions of higher learning.

History.

1992b-49: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 149, § 1; 1968, ch. 119, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although this section specifically excepts from its provisions private funds made available to state universities, bond project revenues are not “private funds” but are state funds falling within the purview of KRS

41.070

and the corporate powers of the state universities in no way militate against the application of KRS

41.070

in connection with subject bond project revenues.

OAG 73-173

.

Since inmate funds are private funds deposited for safekeeping by the institution, the institution is a mere custodian of prisoner funds and may not place the funds on time deposit to earn interest.

OAG 74-279

.

The Kentucky Horse Council (now Horse Park Commission) is an agency of state government and all of its funds from whatever source received, including private sources, contributions and membership fees, upon receipt become public funds of a state agency and are subject to all general constitutional and statutory provisions governing the audit, budgeting, accounting and expenditure of state funds.

OAG 74-715

.

KRS Chapters 45 and 45A concern public funds of the commonwealth such that these provisions are not applicable to the private funds and contributions covered in this section.

OAG 82-520

.

The foundation of a state university (a nonprofit fiduciary holding funds for the benefit of any form of state organization) is not required under KRS

41.070

to deposit moneys received by it in the State Treasury as foundation funds are private rather than public funds.

OAG 82-521

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Federal grants for equalization of library service to be kept in special fund, KRS

171.160

.

Federal grants for forest reserves to be kept in separate fund, KRS

149.130

.

Federal grants for promotion of aviation, how handled, KRS

183.130

.

41.295.
Investment of surplus funds of agencies not supported by taxation. [Repealed.]

41.300.
Special deposit trust fund.

There shall be a special deposit fund consisting of all money received by the state or any department or officer thereof as guarantees for the payment of any costs, charges or damages accruing or liable to accrue to the state or for the performance of any specific act, including all money deposited as bail to secure the liberation of persons accused of public offenses, all money deposited by bidders on contracts to insure their entering into contracts awarded them, and all money deposited to indemnify persons whose property may be damaged or destroyed by the operations of the depositor. All such money shall be paid to the Treasurer, in the manner provided for the deposit of public money, and shall be deposited by the Treasurer as a trust fund in a separate account in a designated state depository. The money so deposited may be returned to the depositor, if he becomes entitled to its return, without specific appropriation, allotment or authorization for expenditure therefor, in the same manner as other claims against the state may be paid, or may, upon default of any depositor and upon certificate to such effect by the administrative officer having charge of the matter, be declared by the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be forfeited in whole or in part and thereupon be transferred to the extent so forfeited to the general fund. The interest on bank deposits of this fund shall accrue to the general fund.

History.

1992b-50: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 2021 ch. 155, § 16, effective June 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Deposit of money in lieu of bail, RCr 4.18 et seq.

Escheat of unclaimed deposits, KRS

393.010

et seq.